Illinois, session 104th, HB2453.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Gender Violence Act is amended by changing 5Section 5 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 82/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Employee" has the meaning provided in Section 2-101 of 9the Illinois Human Rights Act.10    "Employer" has the meaning provided in Section 2-101 of 11the Illinois Human Rights Act. 12    "Gender-related violence", which is a form of sex 13discrimination, means the following:14        (1) One or more acts of violence or physical 15    aggression satisfying the elements of battery under the 16    laws of Illinois that are committed, at least in part, on 17    the basis of a person's sex, whether or not those acts have 18    resulted in criminal charges, prosecution, or conviction.19        (2) A physical intrusion or physical invasion of a 20    sexual nature under coercive conditions satisfying the 21    elements of battery under the laws of Illinois, whether or 22    not the act or acts resulted in criminal charges, 23    prosecution, or conviction.  HB2453- 2 -LRB104 08188 JRC 18238 b1        (2.1) Sexual contact between a sexual organ of one 2    person and the intimate part of another person if, before 3    sexual contact, both persons understood and agreed that a 4    sexually protective device would be used, and the 5    defendant removed the sexually protective device without 6    consent of the plaintiff, and they engaged or continued to 7    engage in sexual contact after removal.8        (2.2) Sexual contact between a sexual organ of one 9    person and the intimate part of another person if, before 10    sexual contact, both persons understood and agreed that a 11    sexually protective device would be used, and they engaged 12    or continued to engage in sexual contact after the 13    defendant knew or became aware that the sexually 14    protective device had been unintentionally removed but did 15    not obtain consent from the plaintiff to engage or 16    continue engaging in sexual contact without the use of a 17    sexually protective device. 18        (2.5) Domestic violence, as defined in the Victims' 19    Economic Security and Safety Act. 20        (3) A threat of an act described in item (1), (2), or 21    (2.5) causing a realistic apprehension that the originator 22    of the threat will commit the act.23    "Sexually protective device" means an internal or external 24condom, spermicide, diaphragm, cervical cap, contraceptive 25sponge, dental dam, or any other physical barrier device 26intended to prevent pregnancy or sexually transmitted   HB2453- 3 -LRB104 08188 JRC 18238 b1infection. "Sexually protective device" does not include an 2intrauterine device or any hormonal birth control method. 3    "Workplace" means the employer's premises, including any 4building, real property, and parking area under the control of 5the employer, or any location used by an employee while in the 6performance of the employee's job duties. "Workplace" includes 7activities occurring off-premises at employer-sponsored events 8where an employee is not performing the employee's job duties.9(Source: P.A. 103-282, eff. 1-1-24.)